Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201850-1503
Applicability of act.

The Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act applies to any contest of the election of a member of the Legislature and any challenge of the qualifications of a member of the Legislature.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 10.